Utah statutes.
38-9a-201.   Wrongful lien injunction -- Forms.
(1) (a)  Any person who believes that he or she is the victim of a wrongful
lien may file a verified written petition for a civil wrongful lien injunction
against the person filing, making, or uttering the lien, notice of interest,
or other encumbrance in the district court in the district in which the
petitioner or respondent resides or in which any of the events occurred.
(b)  A minor accompanied by his or her parent or guardian may file a petition
on his or her own behalf, or a parent, guardian, or custodian may file a
petition on the minor's behalf.
(2) (a) (i)  The Administrative Office of the Courts shall develop and adopt
forms for petitions, ex parte civil wrongful lien injunctions, civil wrongful
lien injunctions, service, and any other necessary forms in accordance with
the provisions of this chapter on or before May 2, 2005.
(ii)  The office shall provide the forms adopted under Subsection (2)(a)(i) to
the clerk of each district court.
(b)  The court clerks shall provide the forms to persons seeking to proceed
under this chapter.
(c)  The district courts shall issue all petitions, injunctions, ex parte
injunctions, and any other necessary forms in the form prescribed by the
Administrative Office of the Courts.
